New York, session 2025-2026, S6304.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new 2 section 440.75 to read as follows: 3 § 440.75 Petition for expungement of records for certain juveniles 4 convicted of a nonviolent offense. 5 1. Any person who has been previously convicted as a juvenile of a 6 nonviolent offense, provided that an eligible offense shall not include 7 any sex offense as defined under subdivision two of section one hundred 8 sixty-eight-a of the correction law, shall after the expiration of a 9 period of seven years from the date of such person's previous 10 conviction, satisfactory completion of such person's probation, parole, 11 supervised release and payment of any fines imposed or restitution 12 ordered, whichever is later, have all records and information pertaining 13 to such person's conviction expunged pursuant to subdivision forty-five 14 of section 1.20 of this chapter. 15 2. For the purpose of this section the term "juvenile" shall mean a 16 person between the ages of seven and eighteen years of age. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00241-01-5